Indiana, session 2026, HB1430.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-10-9-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), if
a local public question must be certified to an election board by law,
that certification must occur no later than noon:
(1) seventy-four (74) days before a primary election if the public
question is to be placed on the primary or municipal primary
election ballot; or
(2) August 1 if the public question is to be placed on the general
or municipal election ballot.
(b) A referendum or local public question:
(1) under IC 20-46-1;
(2) under IC 20-46-9; or
(3) under IC 20-46-10; or
(3) (4) under IC 6-1.1-20 for controlled projects;
may be placed on the ballot only at a general election. Certification of
a local public question under this subsection must occur not later than
2026 IN 1430—LS 6873/DI 152


noon August 1.
SECTION 2. IC 20-40-23 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 23. Preschool Education Program and Fund
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "administrator" means an
administrator selected by a unit under section 12 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "eligible child" refers to an
individual who:
(1) is at least three (3) years of age and less than five (5) years
of age on August 1 of the unit's fiscal year for which a grant
is sought under the local preschool education program;
(2) is a resident of Indiana or otherwise has legal settlement
in Indiana, as determined under IC 20-26-11; and
(3) resides within the boundaries of the unit in which a levy
under IC 20-46-10 is imposed.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "eligible provider" refers to a
provider that is a:
(1) child care center licensed under IC 12-17.2-4;
(2) child care home licensed under IC 12-17.2-5;
(3) child care ministry registered under IC 12-17.2-6;
(4) public school, including a charter school; or
(5) nonpublic school that is accredited by the state board of
education or a national or regional accreditation agency that
is recognized by the state board of education;
that meets the standards determined by an administrator under
section 13 of this chapter.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "fund" refers to a local preschool
education referendum tax levy fund established under section 10
of this chapter.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "levy" refers to a local preschool
education referendum tax levy imposed under IC 20-46-10 for the
fund.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "paths to QUALITY program"
has the meaning set forth in IC 12-17.2-2-14.2(b).
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "preschool education program"
refers to a local preschool education program established under
section 9 of this chapter.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "unit" means a:
(1) county;
(2) first class city, as classified under IC 36-4-1-1; or
(3) second class city, as classified under IC 36-4-1-1.
2026 IN 1430—LS 6873/DI 152


Sec. 9. (a) A unit for which a levy is approved under IC 20-46-10
shall establish a local preschool education program to provide:
(1) tuition assistance to eligible children; and
(2) capacity investments, quality improvement, and capacity
expansion grants to eligible providers.
(b) The administrator selected under section 12 of this chapter
shall administer the preschool education program.
(c) The preschool education program includes eligible providers
in any county in Indiana.
Sec. 10. (a) A unit for which a levy is approved under
IC 20-46-10 shall establish a local preschool education referendum
tax levy fund to support the preschool education program.
(b) A fund established under subsection (a) consists of the
following:
(1) Revenue from a levy imposed under IC 20-46-10.
(2) Interest that accrues from the revenue deposited in the
fund.
(3) Gifts to the fund.
(4) Grants, including grants from private entities.
(c) The administrator shall administer the fund in accordance
with section 11 of this chapter.
(d) Money in the fund does not revert to the general fund of a
unit at the end of the unit's fiscal year.
Sec. 11. (a) The administrator may use money in the fund only
for the following purposes:
(1) To provide tuition assistance for an eligible child to attend
an eligible provider.
(2) To provide payment of the administrative fee described in
subsection (c).
(3) If money in the fund is available at the end of a unit's fiscal
year, money in the fund may be used at the discretion of the
administrator for capacity investments, quality improvement,
and start up grants to expand capacity that meet the eligibility
standards described in this chapter.
(b) Money in the fund may not be used for political advocacy
concerning any public question or for expenditures prohibited by
IC 35-44.1-1.
(c) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid
exclusively from money in the fund. However, an administrator
may not expend more than three percent (3%) of the total amount
deposited into the fund from the referendum levy collections under
IC 20-46-10 during the unit's fiscal year to pay for the expenses of
2026 IN 1430—LS 6873/DI 152


administering the fund.
(d) An expenditure may not be made from the fund unless it is
in accordance with an appropriation made by the fiscal body of the
unit in the manner provided by law.
Sec. 12. (a) The governing body of a unit shall contract with an
administrator to manage the fund in accordance with IC 5-22 or
other applicable statutes.
(b) An administrator selected under subsection (a) must be a
nonprofit corporation that:
(1) is exempt from federal income taxation under Section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(2) is not an eligible provider or affiliated with an eligible
provider.
Sec. 13. (a) Subject to the requirements of this chapter, the
administrator selected under section 12 of this chapter shall do the
following:
(1) Determine the educational standards a provider must meet
to be considered an eligible provider under this chapter.
(2) Develop and provide a uniform selection and application
process for eligible children and eligible providers to receive
tuition assistance.
(3) Verify the information provided by an eligible child or an
eligible provider in an application described in subdivision
(1).
(4) Use federal or state funding, if available, for the purposes
described in section 9(a) of this chapter in order to minimize
withdrawals from the fund.
(5) Disburse money for tuition assistance from the fund to an
eligible provider on behalf of an eligible child.
(6) Determine the number of eligible children who may
participate in the local prekindergarten program based on
available funding and establish a wait list if funding is not
sufficient to provide tuition assistance to each eligible child.
(b) In determining the educational standards described in
subsection (a)(1), an administrator shall require an eligible
provider to, at a minimum, meet the standards of quality
recognized by a Level 3 or Level 4 paths to QUALITY program
rating.
(c) In addition to the standards described in subsection (b), an
administrator may also require an eligible provider to meet more
rigorous criteria, if the criteria does the following:
(1) Relates solely to academic readiness, which may include:
2026 IN 1430—LS 6873/DI 152


(A) alignment to state early learning foundations;
(B) validated readiness measures;
(C) educator learning tied to literacy and numeracy; or
(D) evidence based practices.
(2) Applies uniformly to all eligible providers.
(3) Is prospective and published.
(4) Does not conflict with the academic standards described in
IC 12-17.2 or IC 20-31-4.1.
Sec. 14. (a) An administrator shall obtain an annual
independent financial audit of the preschool program's
administrative and tuition assistance payment activities by a
certified public accountant in accordance with the guidelines of the
state examiner.
(b) The administrator shall:
(1) submit the audit described in subsection (a) to the state
board of accounts for publishing in accordance with IC 5-11;
and
(2) present the audit described in subsection (a) and other
program data at a public meeting of the unit's governing body
at least once during the unit's fiscal year.
SECTION 3. IC 20-46-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 10. Local Preschool Referendum Tax Levy
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "fund" refers to the local
preschool education referendum tax levy fund established under
IC 20-40-23-10.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "levy" refers to the property tax
levy imposed under this chapter.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "referendum" refers to a
referendum under this chapter.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "resolution to extend a
referendum levy" refers to a resolution adopted under section 11
of this chapter to place a referendum on the ballot requesting
authority to continue imposing a tax rate, which is the same as or
lower than the tax rate previously approved by the voters of the
unit.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "unit" means a:
(1) county;
(2) first class city, as classified under IC 36-4-1-1; or
(3) second class city, as classified under IC 36-4-1-1.
Sec. 6. A unit may impose a local preschool education
2026 IN 1430—LS 6873/DI 152


referendum tax levy for the local preschool education referendum
tax levy fund under this chapter.
Sec. 7. (a) Subject to subsection (c), the legislative body of a unit
may adopt a resolution to place a referendum under this chapter
on the ballot if the legislative body determines that a local
preschool education referendum tax levy should be imposed for the
purposes described in IC 20-40-23-9.
(b) The legislative body of the unit shall certify a copy of the
resolution to place a referendum on the ballot to the following:
(1) The department of local government finance, including:
(A) the language for the question required by section 10 of
this chapter, or, in the case of a resolution to extend a
referendum levy, section 12 of this chapter; and
(B) a copy of the revenue spending plan adopted under
subsection (c).
The department shall review the language for compliance
with section 10 or 12 of this chapter, whichever is applicable,
and either approve or reject the language. The department
shall send its decision to the legislative body of the unit not
more than ten (10) days after the resolution is submitted to
the department. If the language is approved, the legislative
body of the unit shall certify a copy of the resolution,
including the language for the question and the department's
approval.
(2) The county fiscal body of the county.
(3) The circuit court clerk of the county.
(c) As part of the resolution described in subsection (a), the
legislative body of the unit shall adopt a revenue spending plan for
the proposed referendum tax levy that includes at least the
following:
(1) An estimate of the amount of annual revenue expected to
be collected if a levy is imposed under this chapter.
(2) The specific purposes for which the revenue collected from
a levy imposed under this chapter will be used.
(3) An estimate of the annual dollar amounts that will be
expended for each purpose described in subdivision (2).
(4) The entity the unit intends to select as the administrator of
the fund and the percentage fee the administrator will receive
under IC 20-40-23-11(c). The percentage fee may not exceed
three percent (3%).
(5) A list of the reporting requirements under IC 20-40-23.
(6) A summary of the education standards the administrator
2026 IN 1430—LS 6873/DI 152


intends to adopt under IC 20-40-23-13.
(d) The legislative body of a unit shall specify in its proposed
budget the unit's revenue spending plan described in subsection (c)
and annually present the revenue spending plan at its public
hearing on the proposed budget under IC 6-1.1-17-3.
Sec. 8. The voters in a referendum may not approve a levy that
is imposed for more than eight (8) years. However, a levy may be
reimposed or extended under this chapter.
Sec. 9. A local preschool education referendum tax levy under
this chapter may be put into effect only if a majority of the
individuals who vote in a referendum that is conducted in
accordance with this chapter approves the unit imposing a levy for
the ensuing calendar year.
Sec. 10. (a) This section does not apply to a referendum on a
resolution certified to the department of local government finance
to extend a referendum levy.
(b) The question to be submitted to the voters in the referendum
must read as follows:
"Shall ________ (insert the name of the unit) increase
property taxes paid to the unit for no more than ______
(insert the number of years immediately following the holding
of the referendum) years for the purpose of funding
administration of a preschool program and tuition assistance
by imposing a property tax rate that does not exceed ______
(insert property tax rate) and results in a maximum annual
amount that does not exceed ______ (insert maximum amount
of annual levy)? If this local preschool referendum public
question is approved by the voters, for a median residence of
______ (insert the unit's median household assessed value,
rounded up to the next fifty thousand dollars ($50,000)), the
property's annual property tax bill would increase by ______
(insert dollar amount, rounded up to the next whole dollar)
per year. (If, in the previous five (5) years, the unit has
conducted a local preschool referendum public question, the
following shall also be included in the ballot language.) The
most recent local preschool referendum public question
proposed by the unit was held in ______ (insert year) and
______ (insert whether the measure passed or failed).".
Sec. 11. (a) Before the legislative body of a unit may adopt a
resolution to extend a referendum levy under this chapter, the
legislative body shall conduct a review of the outcomes report and
independent financial audit obtained by the administrator under
2026 IN 1430—LS 6873/DI 152


IC 20-40-23-14 at a public hearing. The public hearing required
under this subsection must be held during the calendar year that
falls halfway through the term of the initial referendum levy.
(b) A resolution to extend a referendum levy must be:
(1) adopted by the legislative body of a unit; and
(2) approved in a referendum under this chapter;
before December 31 of the final calendar year in which the unit's
previously approved referendum levy is imposed under this
chapter.
Sec. 12. (a) This section applies only to a referendum to allow a
unit to extend a referendum levy.
(b) The question to be submitted to the voters in the referendum
must read as follows:
"Shall _______ (insert the name of the unit) continue to
increase property taxes paid to the unit for no more than
_____ (insert the number of years immediately following the
holding of the referendum) years for the purpose of funding
administration of a preschool program and tuition assistance
by imposing a property tax rate that does not exceed ______
(insert property tax rate) and results in a maximum annual
amount that does not exceed ______ (insert maximum amount
of annual levy)? If this local preschool referendum public
question is NOT approved by the voters, for a median
residence of __________ (insert the unit's median household
assessed value, rounded up to the next fifty thousand dollars
($50,000)), the property's annual tax bill would decrease by
______ (insert dollar amount, rounded up to the next whole
dollar) per year. If this local preschool referendum public
question is approved by the voters, it would be a renewal of
the most recent local preschool referendum public question
passed in ______ (insert year the original local preschool
referendum public question passed) with a property tax rate
of ______ (insert property tax rate of the original local
preschool referendum public question).".
(c) The number of years for which a referendum tax levy may
be extended if the public question under this section is approved
may not exceed eight (8) years.
Sec. 13. Each year, the county auditor, with cooperation from
the department of local government finance, shall determine the
tax rate needed to raise the maximum amount of the annual levy
for the year as described under section 10 or 12 of this chapter, as
applicable, and shall determine all other information needed for
2026 IN 1430—LS 6873/DI 152


the ballot language in those sections.
Sec. 14. The county auditor shall distribute proceeds collected
from an allocation area (as defined in IC 6-1.1-21.2-3) that are
attributable to property taxes imposed after being approved by the
voters in a referendum to the taxing unit for which the referendum
was conducted.
Sec. 15. Each circuit court clerk shall, upon receiving the
question certified by the governing body of a unit under this
chapter, call a meeting of the county election board to make
arrangements for the referendum.
Sec. 16. The referendum shall be held in the next general
election, as provided under IC 3-10-9-3(b), in which all the
registered voters who are residents of the unit are entitled to vote
after certification of the question. The certification of the question
must occur not later than noon August 1.
Sec. 17. Each county election board shall cause:
(1) the question certified to the circuit court clerk by the
governing body of a unit to be placed on the ballot in the form
prescribed by IC 3-10-9-4; and
(2) an adequate supply of ballots and voting equipment to be
delivered to the precinct election board of each precinct in
which the referendum is to be held.
Sec. 18. (a) The individuals entitled to vote in the referendum
are all of the registered voters who reside in the territory of the
unit.
(b) An individual who changes residence from a location within
a unit to a location outside of the unit less than thirty (30) days
before an election under this chapter may not vote on the public
question.
Sec. 19. Each precinct election board shall count the affirmative
votes and the negative votes cast in the referendum and shall
certify those two (2) totals to the county election board of each
county in which the referendum is held. The circuit court clerk of
each county shall, immediately after the votes cast in the
referendum have been counted, certify the results of the
referendum to the department of local government finance. If a
majority of the individuals who voted in the referendum voted
"yes" on the referendum question:
(1) the department of local government finance shall promptly
notify the unit that the unit is authorized to collect, for the
calendar year that next follows the calendar year in which the
referendum is held, a levy not greater than the amount
2026 IN 1430—LS 6873/DI 152


approved in the referendum;
(2) the levy may be imposed for the number of calendar years
approved by the voters following the referendum for the unit
in which the referendum is held; and
(3) the unit shall establish a fund under IC 20-40-23-10.
Sec. 20. A unit's levy under this chapter may not be considered
in the determination of the unit's maximum permissible ad
valorem property tax levy under IC 6-1.1-18.5 or any other
property tax levy imposed by the unit.
Sec. 21. (a) If a majority of the persons who voted in the
referendum did not vote "yes" on the referendum question:
(1) the unit may not make any levy for its local preschool
referendum tax levy fund; and
(2) another referendum under this chapter may not be held
earlier than:
(A) except as provided in clause (B), seven hundred (700)
days after the date of the referendum; or
(B) three hundred fifty (350) days after the date of the
referendum, if a petition that meets the requirements of
subsection (b) is submitted to the county auditor.
(b) If a majority of the individuals who voted in the referendum
did not vote "yes" on the referendum question, a petition may be
submitted to the county auditor to request that the limit under
subsection (a)(2)(B) applies to the holding of a subsequent
referendum by the unit. If such a petition is submitted to the
county auditor and is signed by the lesser of:
(1) five hundred (500) individuals who are either owners of
property within the unit or registered voters residing within
the unit; or
(2) five percent (5%) of the registered voters residing within
the unit;
the limit under subsection (a)(2)(B) applies to the holding of a
second referendum by the unit, and the limit under subsection
(a)(2)(A) does not apply to the holding of a second referendum by
the unit.
Sec. 22. (a) If a referendum is approved by the voters in a unit
under this chapter in a calendar year, another referendum may not
be placed on the ballot in the unit under this chapter in the
following calendar year.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter and in
addition to the restriction specified in subsection (a), if a unit
imposes in a calendar year a referendum levy approved in a
2026 IN 1430—LS 6873/DI 152


referendum under this chapter, the unit may not simultaneously
impose in that calendar year more than one (1) additional
referendum levy approved in a subsequent referendum under this
chapter.
Sec. 23. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, during
the period beginning with the adoption of a resolution by the
legislative body of a unit to place a referendum under this chapter
on the ballot and continuing through the day on which the
referendum is submitted to the voters, the unit may not promote a
position on the referendum by doing any of the following:
(1) Using facilities or equipment, including mail and
messaging systems, owned by the unit to promote a position
on the referendum, unless equal access to the facilities or
equipment is given to persons with a position opposite to that
of the unit.
(2) Making an expenditure of money from a fund controlled
by the unit to promote a position on the referendum.
(3) Using an employee to promote a position on the
referendum during the employee's normal working hours or
paid overtime, or otherwise compelling an employee to
promote a position on the referendum at any time. However,
if a person described in subsection (c) is advocating for or
against a position on the referendum or discussing the
referendum as authorized under subsection (c), an employee
of the unit may assist the person in presenting information on
the referendum, if requested to do so by the person described
in subsection (c).
However, this section does not prohibit an official or employee of
the unit from carrying out duties with respect to a referendum that
are part of the normal and regular conduct of the official's or
employee's office or agency, including the furnishing of factual
information regarding the referendum in response to inquiries
from any person.
(b) This subsection does not apply to:
(1) a personal expenditure to promote a position on a local
public question by an employee of a unit whose employment
is governed by a collective bargaining contract or an
employment contract; or
(2) an expenditure to promote a position on a local public
question by a person or an organization that has a contract or
an arrangement (whether formal or informal) with the unit
solely for the use of the unit's facilities.
2026 IN 1430—LS 6873/DI 152


A person or an organization that has a contract or arrangement
(whether formal or informal) with a unit to provide goods or
services to the unit may not spend any money to promote a position
on the referendum. A person or an organization that violates this
subsection commits a Class A infraction.
(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a member of the legislative
body of the unit may at any time:
(1) personally advocate for or against a position on a
referendum; or
(2) discuss the referendum with any individual, group, or
organization or personally advocate for or against a position
on a referendum before any individual, group, or
organization;
so long as it is not done by using public funds. Advocacy or
discussion allowed under this subsection is not considered a use of
public funds.
Sec. 24. Nothing in this chapter may be construed to create or
obligate creation of a program administered by the state.
Sec. 25. The provisions of this chapter are severable.
SECTION 4. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1430—LS 6873/DI 152